Arkansas statutes. Title 18 Property
Chapter 41

Landlords' Liens

Cross References.

Laborer's lien on object, material, or property, §18-43-102.

Lien on property left on leased premises, §18-16-108.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1860, No. 51, § 5: effective on passage.

Acts 1868, No. 67, § 2: effective on passage.

Acts 1875, No. 29, § 3: effective on passage.

Acts 1885, No. 134, § 4: effective on passage.

Acts 1935, No. 12, § 3: approved Feb. 4, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “Whereas, many landlords who hold rent contracts, notes, or other evidences of debt and lien for rent on lands rented by them, desire to pledge, mortgage or encumber said evidences of debt and liens, now given them under the law, and that said pledge is a necessary part of the financing of the interest of a landlord in the crops now growing and to be grown, an emergency is declared to exist, and all laws and parts of laws in conflict herewith, are hereby repealed and this act shall be in force and effect from and after its passage.”

Acts 1935, No. 161, § 3: approved Mar. 20, 1935. Emergency clause provided: “It appearing that the Government Agencies have practically completed ten thousand loans in this State to farmers and tenants and that the passage of Act No. 32 of the Fiftieth General Assembly will require all of these loans to be re-negotiated, many papers will have to be signed, causing confusion, loss of time and money, an emergency is hereby declared, and this act shall take effect and be in full force from and after its passage.”

Acts 2003, No. 32, § 5: Feb. 3, 2003. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that inadvertent changes to the Uniform Commercial Code-Secured Transactions by the Eighty-Third General Assembly substantially altered the traditional method for establishing landlords' liens on crops which has been operating in this state for over one hundred years. The inadvertent changes have resulted in widespread confusion which threatens to seriously disrupt the traditional process of crop loans and farm land tenancy in this state's largest industry. This confusion and unintended result will continue until this act becomes effective. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

18-41-101. Lien on crop — Period effective — Definition.

(a)

Every landlord shall have a lien upon the crop grown upon the demised premises in any year for rent that shall accrue for the year.

(b)(1)

The lien is perfected and shall have priority over a conflicting security interest in or agricultural lien on the crop regardless of when the conflicting security interest or agricultural lien is perfected.

(2)

The lien shall continue for six (6) months after the last installment of rent under the rental agreement becomes due and payable, and no longer.

(c)(1)

As used in this section, “rent” means all payments to be made to the landlord under the rental agreement.

(2)

“Rent” includes a payment paid on behalf of the tenant by a government agency or other entity.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 67, § 1, p. 245; C. & M. Dig., § 6889; Pope's Dig., § 8845; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-201; Acts 2003, No. 32, § 3; 2017, No. 569, §§ 1, 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2003, No. 32, § 1, provided:

“The General Assembly has determined that by the enactment of Act 1439 of 2001 it inadvertently changed the law regarding landlords' liens on crops. It is the intent of this act to correct that inadvertent change, remove landlords' liens on crops from the application of the Uniform Commercial Code, reestablish Arkansas Code 18-41-101 and 18-41-103 as the law applicable to landlords' liens on crops, and thereby make landlords' liens under Arkansas Code 18-41-101 and 18-41-103 superior to all other liens on the same collateral.”

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment inserted the present second sentence.

The 2017 amendment substituted “last installment of rent under the rental agreement becomes” for “rent shall become” in (b)(2); and added (c).

Cross References.

Lien of employer on crops when no written contract, §18-42-110.

18-41-102. Liability of subtenants.

Any person subrenting lands or tenements shall be held responsible only for the rent of lands and tenements cultivated or occupied by him or her.

History.

Acts 1868, No. 67, § 1, p. 245; C. & M. Dig., § 6892; Pope's Dig., § 8848; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-202.

18-41-103. Lien for advances — Enforcement.

(a)(1)

In addition to the lien given by law to landlords, if any landlord, to enable his or her tenant or employee to make and gather the crop, shall advance the tenant or employee any necessary supplies, either of money, provisions, clothing, stock, or other necessary articles, the landlord shall have a lien upon the crop raised upon the premises for the value of the advances.

(2)

The lien is perfected and shall have priority over a conflicting security interest in or agricultural lien on the crop regardless of when the conflicting security interest or agricultural lien is perfected.

(b)

This lien shall have preference over any mortgage or other conveyance of the crop made by the tenant or employee.

(c)

This lien may be enforced by an action of attachment before any court having jurisdiction, and the lien for advances and for rent may be joined and enforced in the same action.

History.

Acts 1885, No. 134, § 1, p. 225; C. & M. Dig., § 6890; Pope's Dig., § 8846; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-203; Acts 2003, No. 32, § 4; 2017, No. 757, § 1.

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2003, No. 32, § 1, provided:

“The General Assembly has determined that by the enactment of Act 1439 of 2001 it inadvertently changed the law regarding landlords' liens on crops. It is the intent of this act to correct that inadvertent change, remove landlords' liens on crops from the application of the Uniform Commercial Code, reestablish Arkansas Code 18-41-101 and 18-41-103 as the law applicable to landlords' liens on crops, and thereby make landlords' liens under Arkansas Code 18-41-101 and 18-41-103 superior to all other liens on the same collateral.”

Amendments.

The 2003 amendment redesignated former (a) as present (a)(1) and added (a)(2).

The 2017 amendment deleted “or justice of the peace” preceding “having jurisdiction” in (c).

Cross References.

Liens of employers and employees under contract, §18-42-101 et seq.

18-41-104. Priority of tenant employees' liens.

(a)

Whenever any landlord shall endorse, upon any written agreement made by and between his or her tenant and the employees of the tenant, his or her written consent to the terms of the agreement, then, and in that case only, the lien of the employees shall have precedence over that of the landlord.

(b)

This precedence shall be only for the compensation specified in the agreement, the services therein specified having been rendered towards the production of the crop against which the landlord's lien attaches.

History.

Acts 1875, No. 29, § 2, p. 84; C. & M. Dig., § 6891; Pope's Dig., § 8847; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-204.

18-41-105. Waiver to be recited in mortgage.

If any mortgagee procures a waiver of the landlord's lien, in part or in full, he or she shall recite it in his or her mortgage. If the waiver of lien is not recited in the mortgage, or attached thereto, the waiver shall be invalid against any subsequent mortgagee, purchaser, or assignee.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 161, § 1; Pope's Dig., § 8857; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-212.

18-41-106. Right to assign.

(a)

A landlord's lien for rent shall be assignable.

(b)

The holder of any note, contract, or other instrument evidencing the rent for land upon which crops are to be produced during any year may sell, assign, transfer, mortgage, or pledge the note, contract, or other evidence thereof, together with the lien, if any, provided by law in favor of landlords, and the transferee, endorsee, mortgagee, pledgee, or holder thereof shall have the right to enforce the lien so transferred.

History.

Acts 1935, No. 12, §§ 1, 2; Pope's Dig., §§ 8858, 8859; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-210, 51-211.

18-41-107. Purchasers or assignees from bailees.

The purchaser or assignee of the receipt of any ginner, warehouser, cotton factor, or other bailee for any cotton, corn, or other farm products in store or custody of the ginner, warehouser, cotton factor, or other bailee shall not be held to be an innocent purchaser of any such produce against the lien of any landlord or laborer.

History.

Acts 1885, No. 134, § 3, p. 225; C. & M. Dig., § 6893; Pope's Dig., § 8849; A.S.A. 1947, § 51-205.

Publisher's Notes.

This section may be superseded by §4-7-101 et seq., as to negotiable warehouse receipts, bills of lading, and other documents of title. See Grauman v. Johnson, 216 Ark. 362, 225 S.W.2d 678 (1950).

18-41-108. Attachment to enforce.

(a)

Any landlord who has a lien on the crop for rent shall be entitled to bring suit before a circuit court having jurisdiction and have a writ of attachment for the recovery of it, whether the rent is due or not, in the following cases:

(1)

If the tenant is about to remove the crop from the premises without paying the rent; or

(2)

If he or she has removed the crop, or any portion thereof, without the consent of the landlord.

(b)(1)

Before the writ of attachment is issued, the landlord or his or her agent or attorney shall file an affidavit of one (1) of the facts under subdivision (a)(1) or subdivision (a)(2) of this section, that the amount claimed is or will be due for rent, or will be the value of the portion of the crop agreed as rent, stating the time the rent became or would become due and that he or she has a lien on the crop for rent.

(2)

The landlord or his or her agent or attorney shall file with the clerk of the court a bond to the defendant, with sufficient security, in double the amount of his or her claim as sworn to, conditioned that he or she will prove his or her debt or demand and his or her lien in a trial, or that he or she will pay damages against him or her.

(c)

The writ of attachment may be levied on the crop in the possession of the tenant or anyone holding it in his or her right or in the possession of a purchaser from him or her with notice of the lien of the landlord.

(d)

If the rent is not due at the commencement of the suit, the trial shall be stayed until it becomes due, and the attachment, at any time before final trial, may be dissolved in the manner prescribed by law, and the cause proceed as other suits.

History.

Acts 1860, No. 51, §§ 1-4, p. 101; C. & M. Dig., §§ 6897-6900; Pope's Dig., §§ 8853-8856; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 51-206 — 51-209; Acts 2017, No. 757, § 2.

Amendments.

The 2017 amendment, in the introductory language of (a), substituted “circuit court having jurisdiction” for “justice of the peace or in the circuit court, as the case may be”; substituted “If” for “When” in (a)(1) and (a)(2); in (b)(1), substituted “is issued” for “shall issue”, deleted “make and” preceding “file”, substituted “under” for “provided for in”, and deleted “which shall be therein stated” following “claimed”, “to be received” following “agreed”, and “when” following “the time”; in (b)(2), substituted “the clerk of the court” for “the justice or clerk, as the case may be”, and deleted “of law” following “trial” and “as shall be adjudged” following “damages”; and substituted “If the rent is not due” for “If the rent shall not be due” in (d).